North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150B. Administrative Procedure Act.
Article 3. Administrative Hearings.

§ 150B-22.
Settlement; contested case.

It is the policy of this State that any dispute between an agency and another person that involves the person’s rights, duties, or privileges, including licensing or the levy of a monetary penalty, should be settled through informal procedures. In trying to reach a settlement through informal procedures, the agency may not conduct a proceeding at which sworn testimony is taken and witnesses may be cross-examined.

If the agency and the other person do not agree to a resolution of the dispute through informal procedures, either the agency or the person may commence an administrative proceeding to determine the person’s rights, duties, or privileges, at which time the dispute becomes a “contested case.” A party or person aggrieved shall not be required to petition an agency for rule making or to seek or obtain a declaratory ruling before commencing a contested case pursuant to

G.S. 150B-23

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(11); 1991, c. 418, s. 16; 2019-140, s. 2(a).

Department of Health and Human Services Waiver Application.

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 55.1, provides: “Pursuant to 31 U.S.C. § 6504, the Department of Health and Human Services shall request a waiver from the single State agency requirement contained in 42 C.F.R. § 432.10(e)(3) with regard to final decisions in administrative hearings. The waiver application shall include the following:

“(1) The waiver request is made at the direction of the North Carolina General Assembly, which is responsible for the organizational structure of State government.

“(2) The single State agency requirement prevents the establishment of the most effective and efficient arrangement for providing administrative hearings to claimants because it requires that after a hearing and decision by an administrative law judge, the case must be returned to the agency for a final decision. The return to the agency is an unnecessary, time-consuming, and costly additional step.

“(3) The use of another State administrative hearings arrangement will not endanger the objectives of the law authorizing the Medicaid program because the administrative law judges will abide by the properly adopted policies, rules, and regulations of the State Medicaid agency in making final decisions.”

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 55.2, as amended by Session Laws 2012-187, s. 7.3, provides: “If necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall seek United States Environmental Protection Agency approval to become an agency responsible for administering programs under the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq. On or before December 31, 2011, the Office of Administrative Hearings and the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall jointly develop and submit any Memoranda of Agreement, delineations of programmatic responsibility, procedure for coordination, and other information that United States Environmental Protection Agency may require in order to effectuate any necessary approval process.”

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 61.1, effective July 25, 2011, provides: “The Office of Administrative Hearings shall evaluate the use of mediated settlement conferences under

G.S. 150B-23.1

and shall develop a plan to expand the use of mediation in the contested case process. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall report its findings and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Regulatory Reform Committee by February 1, 2012.”

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.15A(h1)-(h6), as amended and added to by Session Laws 2008-118, s. 3.13(a), (b), and as amended by Session Laws 2009-526, s. 2(a) and (b), Session Laws 2009-550, s. 1.1(a) and (b), and Session Laws 2010-31, s. 10.30(b), provides:

“(h1)(1)

General Rule.

— Notwithstanding any provision of State law or rules to the contrary, this subsection shall govern the process used by a Medicaid applicant or recipient to appeal a determination made by the Department of Health and Human Services to deny, terminate, suspend, or reduce Medicaid covered services. For purposes of this subsection, the phrase ‘adverse determination’ means a determination by the Department to deny, terminate, suspend, or reduce Medicaid covered services. For purposes of this subsection, all references to an applicant or recipient include the applicant or recipient’s parent, guardian, or legal representative; however, notice need only be given to a parent, guardian, or legal representative who has requested in writing to receive the notice.

“(2)

Notice.

— Except as otherwise provided by federal law or regulation, at least 10 days before the effective date of an adverse determination, the Department shall notify the applicant or recipient, and the provider, if applicable, in writing of the determination and of the applicant’s or recipient’s right to appeal the determination. The notice shall be mailed on the date indicated on the notice as the date of the determination. The notice shall include:

“a. An identification of the applicant or recipient whose services are being affected by the adverse determination, including full name and Medicaid identification number.

“b. An explanation of what service is being denied, terminated, suspended, or reduced and the reason for the determination.

“c. The specific regulation, statute, or medical policy that supports or requires the adverse determination.

“d. The effective date of the adverse determination.

“e. An explanation of the applicant’s or recipient’s right to appeal the Department’s adverse determination in an evidentiary hearing before an administrative law judge.

“f. An explanation of how the applicant or recipient can request a hearing and a statement that the applicant or recipient may represent himself or use legal counsel, a relative, or other spokesperson.

“g. A statement that the applicant or recipient will continue to receive Medicaid services at the level provided on the day immediately preceding the Department’s adverse determination or the amount requested by the applicant or recipient, whichever is less, if the applicant or recipient requests a hearing before the effective date of the adverse determination. The services shall continue until the hearing is completed and a final decision is rendered.

“h. The name and telephone number of a contact person at the Department to respond in a timely fashion to the applicant’s or recipient’s questions.

“i. The telephone number by which the applicant or recipient may contact a Legal Aid/Legal Services office.

“j. The appeal request form described in subdivision (4) of this subsection that the applicant or recipient may use to request a hearing.

“(3)

Appeals.

— Except as provided by this subsection and subsection 10.15A(h2) of this act, a request for a hearing to appeal an adverse determination of the Department under this section is a contested case subject to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The applicant or recipient must request a hearing within 30 days of the mailing of the notice required by subdivision (2) of this subsection by sending an appeal request form to the Office of Administrative Hearings and the Department. Where a request for hearing concerns the reduction, modification, or termination of Medicaid services, upon the receipt of a timely appeal, the Department shall reinstate the services to the level or manner prior to action by the Department as permitted by federal law or regulation. The Department shall immediately forward a copy of the notice to the Office of Administrative Hearings electronically. The information contained in the notice is confidential unless the recipient appeals. The Office of Administrative Hearings may dispose of the records after one year. The Department may not influence, limit, or interfere with the applicant’s or recipient’s decision to request a hearing.

“4.

Appeal Request Form.

— Along with the notice required by subdivision (2) of this subsection, the Department shall also provide the applicant or recipient with an appeal request form which shall be no more than one side of one page. The form shall include the following:

“a. A statement that in order to request an appeal, the applicant or recipient must send the form by mail or fax to the address or fax number listed on the form within 30 days of mailing of the notice.

“b. The applicant’s or recipient’s name, address, telephone number, and Medicaid identification number.

“c. A preprinted statement that indicates that the applicant or recipient would like to appeal the specific adverse determination of which the applicant or recipient was notified in the notice.

“d. A statement informing the applicant or recipient that he or she may choose to be represented by a lawyer, a relative, a friend, or other spokesperson.

“e. A space for the applicant’s or recipient’s signature and date.

“(5)

Final Decision.

— After a hearing before an administrative law judge, the judge shall return the decision and record to the Department in accordance with subsection 10.15A(h2) of this act. The Department shall make a final decision in the case within 20 days of receipt of the decision and record from the administrative law judge and promptly notify the applicant or recipient of the final decision and of the right to judicial review of the decision pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

“(h2)(1)

Application.

— This subsection applies only to contested Medicaid cases commenced by Medicaid applicants or recipients under subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 10.15A(h1) and this subsection governing time lines and procedural steps, a contested Medicaid case commenced by a Medicaid applicant or recipient is subject to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B. To the extent any provision in this subsection or subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act conflicts with another provision in Article 3 of Chapter 150B, this subsection and subsection 10.15A(h1) controls.

“(2)

Simple Procedures.

— Notwithstanding any other provision of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the chief administrative law judge may limit and simplify the procedures that apply to a contested Medicaid case involving a Medicaid applicant or recipient in order to complete the case as quickly as possible. To the extent possible, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall schedule and hear all contested Medicaid cases within 55 days of submission of a request for appeal. Hearings shall be conducted telephonically or by video technology, however the recipient or applicant, or the recipient’s or applicant’s representative may request that the hearing be conducted before the administrative law judge in-person. An in-person hearing shall be conducted in Wake County, however for good cause shown, the in-person hearing may be conducted in the county of residence of the recipient or applicant. Good cause shall include but is not limited to the applicant’s or recipient’s impairments limiting travel or the unavailability of the applicant’s or recipient’s treating professional witnesses. The Department shall provide written notice to the recipient or applicant of the use of telephonic hearings, hearings by video conference, and in-person hearings before the administrative law judge, and how to request a hearing in the recipient’s or applicant’s county of residence. The simplified procedure may include requiring that all prehearing motions be considered and ruled on by the administrative law judge in the course of the hearing of the case on the merits. An administrative law judge assigned to a contested Medicaid case shall make reasonable efforts in a case involving a Medicaid applicant or recipient who is not represented by an attorney to assure a fair hearing and to maintain a complete record of the hearing. The administrative law judge may allow brief extensions of the time limits contained in this section for good cause and to ensure that the record is complete. Good cause includes delays resulting from untimely receipt of documentation needed to render a decision and other unavoidable and unforeseen circumstances. Continuances shall only be granted in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Administrative Hearings, and shall not be granted on the day of the hearing, except for good cause shown. If a petitioner fails to make an appearance at a hearing that has been properly noticed via certified mail by the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall immediately dismiss the contested case provision.

“(3)

Mediation.

— Upon receipt of an appeal request form as provided by subdivision 10.15A(h1)(4) of this act or other clear request for a hearing by a Medicaid applicant or recipient, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall immediately notify the Mediation Network of North Carolina which shall within five days contact the petitioner to offer mediation in an attempt to resolve the dispute. If mediation is accepted, the mediation must be completed within 25 days of submission of the request for appeal. Upon completion of the mediation, the mediator shall inform the Office of Administrative Hearings and the Department within 24 hours of the resolution by facsimile or electronic messaging. If the parties have resolved matters in the mediation, the case shall be dismissed by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall not conduct any contested Medicaid cases hearings until it has received notice from the mediator assigned that either: (i) the mediation was unsuccessful, or (ii) the petitioner has rejected the offer of mediation, or (iii) the petitioner has failed to appear at a scheduled mediation. Nothing in this subdivision shall restrict the right to a contested case hearing.

“(4)

Burden of Proof.

— The petitioner has the burden of proof to show entitlement to a requested benefit or the propriety of requested agency action when the agency has denied the benefit or refused to take the particular action. The agency has the burden of proof when the appeal is from an agency determination to impose a penalty or reduce, terminate, or suspend a benefit previously granted. The party with the burden of proof on any issue has the burden of going forward, and the administrative law judge shall not make any ruling on the preponderance of evidence until the close of all evidence.

“(4a)

New Evidence.

— The petitioner shall be permitted to submit evidence regardless of whether obtained prior to or subsequent to the Department’s actions and regardless of whether the Department had an opportunity to consider the evidence in making its determination to deny, reduce, terminate or suspend a benefit. When such evidence is received, at the request of the Department, the administrative law judge shall continue the hearing for a minimum of 15 days and a maximum of 30 days to allow for the Department’s review of the evidence. Subsequent to review of the evidence, if the Department reverses its original decision, it shall immediately inform the administrative law judge.

“(4b)

Issue for Hearing.

— For each penalty imposed or benefit reduced, terminated, or suspended, the hearing shall determine whether the Department substantially prejudiced the rights of the petitioner and if the Department, based upon evidence at the hearing:

“a. Exceeded its authority or jurisdiction;

“b. Acted erroneously;

“c. Failed to use proper procedure;

“d. Acted arbitrarily or capriciously; or,

“e. Failed to act as required by law or rule.

“(5)

Decision.

— The administrative law judge assigned to a contested Medicaid case shall hear and decide the case without unnecessary delay. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall send a copy of the audiotape or diskette of the hearing to the agency within five days of completion of the hearing. The judge shall prepare a written decision and send it to the parties. The decision must be sent together with the record to the agency within 20 days of the conclusion of the hearing.

“(h3) From funds available to the Department of Health and Human Services (Department) for the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be transferred by the Department to the Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH). These funds shall be allocated by OAH for mediation services provided for Medicaid
recipient appeals and to contract for other services necessary to conduct the appeals process. OAH shall continue the Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) with the Department for mediation services provided for Medicaid recipient appeals and contracted services necessary to conduct the appeals process. The MOA will facilitate the Department’s ability to draw down federal Medicaid funds to support this administrative function. Upon receipt of invoices from OAH for covered services rendered in accordance with the MOA, the Department shall transfer the federal share of Medicaid funds drawn down for this purpose.

“(h4) Effective October 1, 2008, the Department of Health and Human Services shall discontinue its current informal appeals process for Medicaid applicants and recipients appealing a determination made by the Department to deny, terminate, suspend, or reduce Medicaid covered services. All such informal appeals by Medicaid applicants or recipients under the current system which are pending on that date and for which a hearing has not been held shall be discontinued and the applicant or recipient offered an opportunity to appeal to the Office of Administrative Hearings in accordance with the provisions of subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act. The Department shall make every effort to resolve or settle all of the backlogged cases prior to the effective date of this act.

“(h5) Nothing in this act shall prevent the Department of Health and Human Services from engaging in an informal review of the case with the applicant or recipient prior to issuing a notice of adverse determination as provided by subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act.

“(h6) The appeals process for Medicaid applicants and recipients established under this section shall expire July 1, 2010. The Department of Health and Human Services and the Office of Administrative Hearings shall each report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on March 1, 2009, October 1, 2009, and March 1, 2010, on the costs, effectiveness, and efficiency of the appeals process for Medicaid applicants and recipients and make recommendations regarding the continuation of the process.”

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.15A(e1)-(e4), as amended by Session Laws 2009-526, s. 2(c), provides for administrative appeals by community support providers. See notes under

G.S. 150B-1

, 122C-115.4, and 122C-151.4.

§ 150B-22.1.
Special education petitions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, timelines and other procedural safeguards required to be provided under IDEA and Article 9 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes must be followed in an impartial due process hearing initiated when a petition is filed under

G.S. 115C-109.6

with the Office of Administrative Hearings.

The administrative law judge who conducts a hearing under

G.S. 115C-109.6

shall not be a person who has a personal or professional interest that conflicts with the judge’s objectivity in the hearing. Furthermore, the judge must possess knowledge of, and the ability to understand, IDEA and legal interpretations of IDEA by federal and State courts. The judges are encouraged to participate in training developed and provided by the State Board of Education under G.S. 115C-107.2(h)[(g)].

For the purpose of this section, the term “IDEA” means The Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400, et seq., (2004), as amended, and its regulations.

History.

2006-69, s. 5.

§ 150B-23.
Commencement; assignment of administrative law judge; hearing required; notice; intervention.

A contested case shall be commenced by paying a fee in an amount established in

G.S. 150B-2

3.2 and by filing a petition with the Office of Administrative Hearings and, except as provided in Article 3A of this Chapter, shall be conducted by that Office. The party that files the petition shall serve a copy of the petition on all other parties and, if the dispute concerns a license, the person that holds the license. A party that files a petition shall file a certificate of service together with the petition. A petition shall be signed by a party, an attorney representing a party, or other representative of the party as may specifically be authorized by law, and, if filed by a party other than an agency, shall state facts tending to establish that the agency named as the respondent has deprived the petitioner of property, has ordered the petitioner to pay a fine or civil penalty, or has otherwise substantially prejudiced the petitioner’s rights and that the agency did any of the following:

Exceeded its authority or jurisdiction.

Acted erroneously.

Failed to use proper procedure.

Acted arbitrarily or capriciously.

Failed to act as required by law or rule.The parties in a contested case shall be given an opportunity for a hearing without undue delay. Any person aggrieved may commence a contested case under this section.A local government employee, applicant for employment, or former employee to whom Chapter 126 of the General Statutes applies may commence a contested case under this Article in the same manner as any other petitioner. The case shall be conducted in the same manner as other contested cases under this Article.A business entity may represent itself using a nonattorney representative who is one or more of the following of the business entity: (i) officer, (ii) manager or member-manager, if the business entity is a limited liability company, (iii) employee whose income is reported on IRS Form W-2, if the business entity authorizes the representation in writing, or (iv) owner of the business entity, if the business entity authorizes the representation in writing and if the owner’s interest in the business entity is at least twenty-five percent (25%). Authority for and prior notice of nonattorney representation shall be made in writing, under penalty of perjury, to the Office on a form provided by the Office.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(9).

(a2)

An administrative law judge assigned to a contested case may require a party to the case to file a prehearing statement. A party’s prehearing statement shall be served on all other parties to the contested case.

(a3)

A Medicaid or NC Health Choice enrollee, or the enrollee’s authorized representative, who appeals a notice of resolution issued by a managed care entity under Chapter 108D of the General Statutes may commence a contested case under this Article in the same manner as any other petitioner. The case shall be conducted in the same manner as other contested cases initiated by Medicaid or NC Health Choice enrollees under this Article. Solely and only for the purposes of contested cases commenced pursuant to

G.S. 108D-1

5 by enrollees of LME/MCOs to appeal a notice of resolution issued by the LME/MCO, an LME/MCO is considered an agency as defined in

G.S. 150B-2

. The LME/MCO is not considered an agency for any other purpose. When a prepaid health plan, as defined in

G.S. 108D-1

, other than an LME/MCO, is under contract with the Department of Health and Human Services to issue notices of resolution under Article 2 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes, then solely and only for the purposes of contested cases commenced pursuant to

G.S. 108D-15

to appeal a notice of resolution issued by the prepaid health plan, the prepaid health plan is considered an agency as defined in G.S. 150B-2. The prepaid health plan is not considered an agency for any other purpose.

(a4)

If an agency fails to take any required action within the time period specified by law, any person whose rights are substantially prejudiced by the agency’s failure to act may commence a contested case in accordance with this section seeking an order that the agency act as required by law. If the administrative law judge finds that the agency has failed to act as required by law, the administrative law judge may order that the agency take the required action within a specified time period.

(a5)

A county that appeals a decision of the Department of Health and Human Services to temporarily assume Medicaid eligibility administration in accordance with

G.S. 108A-70.42

or

G.S. 108A-70.50

may commence a contested case under this Article in the same manner as any other petitioner. The case shall be conducted in the same manner as other contested cases under this Article.

The parties to a contested case shall be given a notice of hearing not less than 15 days before the hearing by the Office of Administrative Hearings. If prehearing statements have been filed in the case, the notice shall state the date, hour, and place of the hearing. If prehearing statements have not been filed in the case, the notice shall state the date, hour, place, and nature of the hearing, shall list the particular sections of the statutes and rules involved, and shall give a short and plain statement of the factual allegations.

Notice shall be given by one of the methods for service of process under

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j) or Rule 4(j3). If given by registered or certified mail, by signature confirmation as provided by the United States Postal Service, or by designated delivery service authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 7502(f)(2) with delivery receipt, notice is deemed to have been given on the delivery date appearing on the return receipt, copy of the proof of delivery provided by the United States Postal Service, or delivery receipt. If giving of notice cannot be accomplished by a method under

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j) or Rule 4(j3), notice shall then be given in the manner provided in G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j1).

Any person may petition to become a party by filing a motion to intervene in the manner provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 24. In addition, any person interested in a contested case may intervene and participate in that proceeding to the extent deemed appropriate by the administrative law judge.

All hearings under this Chapter shall be open to the public. Hearings shall be conducted in an impartial manner. Hearings shall be conducted according to the procedures set out in this Article, except to the extent and in the particulars that specific hearing procedures and time standards are governed by another statute.

Unless another statute or a federal statute or regulation sets a time limitation for the filing of a petition in contested cases against a specified agency, the general limitation for the filing of a petition in a contested case is 60 days. The time limitation, whether established by another statute, federal statute, or federal regulation, or this section, commences when notice is given of the agency decision to all persons aggrieved that are known to the agency by personal delivery, electronic delivery, or by the placing of the notice in an official depository of the United States Postal Service wrapped in a wrapper addressed to the person at the latest address given by the person to the agency. The notice shall be in writing, shall set forth the agency action, and shall inform the persons of the right, the procedure, and the time limit to file a contested case petition. When no informal settlement request has been received by the agency prior to issuance of the notice, any subsequent informal settlement request shall not suspend the time limitation for the filing of a petition for a contested case hearing. When the Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court determines and declares that catastrophic conditions exist or have existed in one or more counties of the State and issues an order pursuant to G.S. 7A-39(b), the chief administrative law judge may by order entered pursuant to this subsection extend, to a date certain no fewer than 10 days after the effective date of the order, the time or period of limitation, whether established by another statute or this section, for the filing of a petition for a contested case. The order shall be in writing and becomes effective for each affected county upon the date set forth in the order, and if no date is set forth in the order, then upon the date the order is signed by the chief administrative law judge. The order shall provide that it expires upon the expiration of the Chief Justice’s order.

Where multiple licenses are required from an agency for a single activity, the Secretary or chief administrative officer of the agency may issue a written determination that the administrative decision reviewable under Article 3 of this Chapter occurs on the date the last license for the activity is issued, denied, or otherwise disposed of. The written determination of the administrative decision is not reviewable under this Article. Any licenses issued for the activity prior to the date of the last license identified in the written determination are not reviewable under this Article until the last license for the activity is issued, denied, or otherwise disposed of. A contested case challenging the last license decision for the activity may include challenges to agency decisions on any of the previous licenses required for the activity.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 65; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, ss. 1(9), (10), 6(2), (3); 1987, c. 878, ss. 3-5; c. 879, s. 6.1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 5; 1991, c. 35, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 572, s. 2; 2009-451, s. 21A.1(a); 2011-332, s. 2.1; 2011-398, s. 16; 2012-187, s. 6; 2013-397, s. 4; 2014-120, ss. 7(a), 48, 59(a); 2016-94, s. 12H.17(c); 2017-57, s. 11H.22(d); 2018-114, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 11; 2020-3, s. 4.26(a); 2021-88, s. 16(e).

§ 150B-23.1.
Mediated settlement conferences.

Purpose. — This section authorizes a mediation program in the Office of Administrative Hearings in which the chief administrative law judge may require the parties in a contested case to attend a prehearing settlement conference conducted by a mediator. The purpose of the program is to determine whether a system of mediated settlement conferences may make the operation of the Office of Administrative Hearings more efficient, less costly, and more satisfying to the parties.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Mediated settlement conference. — A conference ordered by the chief administrative law judge involving the parties to a contested case and conducted by a mediator prior to a contested case hearing.

Mediator. — A neutral person who acts to encourage and facilitate a resolution of a contested case but who does not make a decision on the merits of the contested case.

Conference. — The chief administrative law judge may order a mediated settlement conference for all or any part of a contested case to which an administrative law judge is assigned to preside. All aspects of the mediated settlement conference shall be conducted insofar as possible in accordance with the rules adopted by the Supreme Court for the court-ordered mediation pilot program under

G.S. 7A-38

.

Attendance. — The parties to a contested case in which a mediated settlement conference is ordered, their attorneys, and other persons having authority to settle the parties’ claims shall attend the settlement conference unless excused by the presiding administrative law judge.

Mediator. — The parties shall have the right to stipulate to a mediator. Upon the failure of the parties to agree within a time limit established by the presiding administrative law judge, a mediator shall be appointed by the presiding administrative law judge.

Sanctions. — Upon failure of a party or a party’s attorney to attend a mediated settlement conference ordered under this section, the presiding administrative law judge may impose any sanction authorized by G.S. 150B-33(b)(8) or (10).

Standards. — Mediators authorized to conduct mediated settlement conferences under this section shall comply with the standards adopted by the Supreme Court for the court-ordered mediation pilot program under

G.S. 7A-38

.

Immunity. — A mediator acting pursuant to this section shall have judicial immunity in the same manner and to the same extent as a judge of the General Court of Justice.

Costs. — Costs of a mediated settlement conference shall be paid one share by the petitioner, one share by the respondent, and an equal share by any intervenor, unless otherwise apportioned by the administrative law judge.

Inadmissibility of Negotiations. — All conduct or communications made during a mediated settlement conference are presumed to be made in compromise negotiations and shall be governed by Rule 408 of the North Carolina Rules of Evidence.

Right to Hearing. — Nothing in this section restricts the right to a contested case hearing.

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 25(b); c. 363, ss. 1, 3; 1995, c. 145, s. 1.

§ 150B-23.2.
Fee for filing a contested case hearing.

Filing Fee. — In every contested case commenced in the Office of Administrative Hearings by a person aggrieved, the petitioner shall pay a filing fee, and the administrative law judge shall have the authority to assess that filing fee against the losing party, in the amount of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00), unless the Office of Administrative Hearings establishes a lesser filing fee by rule.

Time of Collection. — All fees that are required to be assessed, collected, and remitted under subsection (a) of this section shall be collected by the Office of Administrative Hearings at the time of commencement of the contested case except as may be allowed by rule to permit or complete late payment or in suits in forma pauperis.

Forms of Payment. — The Office of Administrative Hearings may by rule provide for the acceptable forms for payment and transmission of the filing fee.

Waiver or Refund. — The Office of Administrative Hearings shall by rule provide for the fee to be waived in a contested case in which the petition is filed in forma pauperis and supported by such proofs as are required in

G.S. 1-110

and in a contested case involving a mandated federal cause of action. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall by rule provide for the fee to be refunded in a contested case in which the losing party is the State.

History.

2009-451, s. 21A.1(b); 2012-187, s. 5; 2015-264, s. 24.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 24, effective October 1, 2015, substituted “Waiver” for “Wavier” in the subsection (d) heading.

§ 150B-23.3.
Electronic filing.

In addition to any other method specified in

G.S. 150B-23

, documents filed and served in a contested case may be filed and served electronically by means of an Electronic Filing Service Provider. For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Electronic filing” means the electronic transmission of the petition, notice of hearing, pleadings, or any other documents filed in a contested case with the Office of Administrative Hearings, as further defined by rules adopted by the Office of Administrative Hearings.

“Electronic Filing Service Provider (EFSP)” means the service provided by the Office of Administrative Hearings for e-filing and e-service of documents via the Internet.

“Electronic service” means the electronic transmission of the petition, notice of hearing, pleadings, or any other documents in a contested case, as further defined by rules adopted by the Office of Administrative Hearings.

History.

2014-120, s. 5(a).

§ 150B-24.
Venue of hearing.

The hearing of a contested case shall be conducted:

In the county in this State in which any person whose property or rights are the subject matter of the hearing maintains his residence;

In the county where the agency maintains its principal office if the property or rights that are the subject matter of the hearing do not affect any person or if the subject matter of the hearing is the property or rights of residents of more than one county; or

In any county determined by the administrative law judge in his discretion to promote the ends of justice or better serve the convenience of witnesses.

Any person whose property or rights are the subject matter of the hearing waives his objection to venue by proceeding in the hearing.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, s. 6.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).

§ 150B-25.
Conduct of hearing; answer.

If a party fails to appear in a contested case after proper service of notice, and if no adjournment or continuance is granted, the administrative law judge may proceed with the hearing in the absence of the party.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 35, s. 2.

The parties shall be given an opportunity to present arguments on issues of law and policy and an opportunity to present evidence on issues of fact.

A party may cross-examine any witness, including the author of a document prepared by, on behalf of, or for use of the agency and offered in evidence. Any party may submit rebuttal evidence.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(13); 1987, c. 878, s. 6; 1991, c. 35, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).

For article, “Advisory Rulings by Administrative Agencies: Their Benefits and Dangers,” see 2 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (1980).

§ 150B-25.1.
Burden of proof.

Except as otherwise provided by law or by this section, the petitioner in a contested case has the burden of proving the facts alleged in the petition by a preponderance of the evidence.

In a contested case involving the imposition of civil fines or penalties by a State agency for violation of the law, the burden of showing by clear and convincing evidence that the person who was fined actually committed the act for which the fine or penalty was imposed rests with the State agency.

The burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that a career State employee subject to Chapter 126 of the General Statutes was discharged, suspended, or demoted for just cause rests with the agency employer.

History.

2015-286, s. 1.2(a).

§ 150B-26.
Consolidation.

When contested cases involving a common question of law or fact or multiple proceedings involving the same or related parties are pending, the Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings may order a joint hearing of any matters at issue in the cases, order the cases consolidated, or make other orders to reduce costs or delay in the proceedings.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985, (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(1), 1(14).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).